src/fst/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexd
LEXICON Adverbs
ak
ake'
aran
arin
ayi'
b'an
chirixkil
ch'in
ch'inqal
ch'inqil
ch'utch'u
elajik
enhe'
ewer
eweraq
heehe'
hik'o
hoon
hulaj
ink'a'
junpak'al
junsut
junwa
jwal
kalkab'
kama'an
kama'in
ka'b'ayaq
ka'pak'al
ka'wa
ka'ajwi'
kok'sa'
k'a'aq
le'
mare
maare
maab'ar
ninqilwankil
oxsut
oxwa
q'emalk'uub'
ramro'
sa'in
taq'a
tixto
us
wej
wuqub'ixk
xe'nawomil
yal

PATTERN Complete_Adverbs
Adverbs [<Adv>:]
